Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1407 of Title 20, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As authorized pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 11 of
Article VII of the Oklahoma Constitution, a Justice of the Supreme
Court, a Judge of the Court of Criminal Appeals or of the Court of
Civil Appeals, or a district or associate district court judge shall
retire when he or she reaches seventy-five (75) years of age;
provided, however, such appellate Justice or Judge or district or
associate district court judge may complete the term during which he
or she turns seventy-five (75) years of age if he or she chooses to
complete such term. Upon retiring, each such appellate Justice or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1118 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Judg e or district or associate district court judge shall receive
retirement benefits as provided by law.
B. An appellate Justice or Judge or district or associate
district court judge who has reached seventy-five (75) years of age
on or before the effective date of this act shall retire on the
effective date of this act; provided, however, such appellate Justice
or Judge or district or associate district court judge may complete
the term during which this act was enacted if he or she chooses to
complete such term. Upon retiring, each such appellate Justice or
Judge or district or associate district court judge shall receive
retirement benefits as provided by law.
C. No person shall be eligible for election, retention, or
appointment to any appellate or district court who has reached
seventy-five (75) years of age prior to or on the date of election
or appointment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 25, 2025 - DO PASS







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1118 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)